Missouri, session 2026, SB976.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 105.465, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 105.465,
to read as follows:
105.465. 1. Any person who registers as a lobbyist
shall dissolve his or her candidate committee. In the
course of dissolving such committee, such person shall not
disburse moneys from such committee, except for the purpose
of:
(1) Returning a contribution made to the candidate
committee to the entity responsible for making the
contribution to the committee;
(2) Donating moneys to a nonprofit entity qualified as
exempt from federal taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; or
(3) Transferring moneys to a political party committee.
2. Notwithstanding subsection 1 of this section to the
contrary, no person who registers as a lobbyist shall be
prohibited from maintaining a candidate committee designated
to seek election to a county, municipal, or school board
office, provided such person is not registered to lobby the
county, municipality, or school district for which that
person's candidate committee is designated to seek office.
Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a person from
changing the designated office sought by his or her
1

candidate committee, provided such person is never
simultaneously registered to lobby the public office for
which such person's committee is designated to seek office.
A candidate committee maintained under this subsection shall
make no expenditures or disbursements except to support the
candidacy of the person maintaining the committee or for any
purpose authorized by subdivisions (1) to (3) of subsection
1 of this section.
3. For purposes of this section, the term "lobbyist"
shall have the same meaning given to such term under section
105.470, and the terms "committee", "candidate committee",
"contribution", "office", "public office", and "political
party committee" shall have the same meanings given to such
terms under section 130.011.
2